Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,156
Funding; preference.

When selecting projects for funding under the Business Innovation Act, the department shall give a preference to projects located in whole or in part within an economic redevelopment area, an enterprise zone designated pursuant to the Enterprise Zone Act, or an opportunity zone designated pursuant to the federal Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, Public Law 115-97.

Laws 2011, LB387, § 5;

Laws 2014, LB800, § 8;

Laws 2017, LB217, § 35;

Laws 2019, LB87, § 4;

Laws 2022, LB1012, § 23.

Enterprise Zone Act, see section 13-2101.01.